Hawaii statutes.
[§198-2] Nature. (a) A conservation
easement is freely transferable in whole or in part for the purposes stated in
section 198-1 by any lawful method for the transfer of interests in real
property in this State.

(b) A conservation easement shall be perpetual
in duration.

(c) A conservation easement shall not be
deemed personal in nature and shall constitute an interest in real property
notwithstanding the fact that it may be negative in character.

(d) The particular characteristics of a
conservation easement shall be those granted or specified in the instrument
creating or transferring the easement. [L 1985, c 149, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next